apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="маршрут__n_m_nn">
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="кри/га__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>га</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гу</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>зі</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>зі</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гою</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>го</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>г</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гам</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гах</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гами</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ги</l><r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="карат__n_m_nn">
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ові</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ів</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="інформуван/ня__n_nt_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ню</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ні</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ням</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ням</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нях</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нями</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="знущан/ня__n_nt_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ню</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ні</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ням</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ь</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ням</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нях</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>нями</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ня</l><r>ня<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="маршрут"><i>маршрут</i><par n="маршрут__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="крига"><i>кри</i><par n="кри/га__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="карат"><i>карат</i><par n="карат__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="інформування"><i>інформуван</i><par n="інформуван/ня__n_nt_nn"/></e>
<e lm="знущання"><i>знущан</i><par n="знущан/ня__n_nt_nn"/></e>
